Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1923
Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 23.